Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
ADMINISTRATION AND REPORTING
SECTION 1. (1) No later than September 15, 2024, the Director of the Employment De-
partment shall report to an interim committee of the Legislative Assembly related to labor
and business information on:
(a) The payment of benefits under  ORS chapter 657B to seasonal employees and persons
employed through hiring halls; and
(b) The consideration of implementing programmatic changes to the  paid family and
medical leave program established under ORS chapter 657B.
(2) No later than  September 15, 2024, the Bureau of Labor and Industries and the Em-
ployment Department shall  jointly report to an interim committee of the Legislative As-
sembly related to labor and business on the apportionment  of duties between the Bureau of
Labor and Industries and the Employment Department regarding  the protected leave pro-
visions of ORS chapters 657B and 659A, including:
(a) The current roles and responsibilities of the agencies with respect to:
(A) Administration, rulemaking,  education and enforcement of the protected leave pro-
visions; and
(B) Other aspects of the protected leave provisions, including issues concerning discrim-
ination, retaliation and job protection;
(b) Possible future roles and responsibilities of the agencies with respect to the topics
described under paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
(c) Any statutory changes that  are necessary to clarify the roles and responsibilities of
the agencies to enable the agencies to provide the best  support to employees and employers
regarding protected leave.
TECHNICAL CHANGES
Enrolled Senate Bill 1515 (SB 1515-A) Page 1
SECTION 2.  ORS 653.455 is amended to read:
653.455. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Group communication” means communication to  all eligible employees, either written or
oral.
(b) “Ticketed event” means a  sporting, entertainment, civic, charitable or other event that re-
quires a ticket for admission.  The ticket may be electronic, physical or a name on a list held by the
event organizer.
(2) An employer  shall provide the following compensation to an employee for each employer-
requested change that occurs to the employee’s written work schedule without the  advance notice
required in ORS 653.436:
(a) One hour of pay at the employee’s regular rate of pay, in addition to  wages earned, when
the employer:
(A) Adds more than 30 minutes of work to the employee’s work shift;
(B) Changes the date or  start or end time of the employee’s work shift with no loss of hours;
or
(C) Schedules the employee for an additional work shift or on-call shift.
(b) One-half times the employee’s regular rate of pay per hour for  each scheduled hour that the
employee does not work when the employer:
(A) Subtracts hours from the employee’s work shift before or after the employee  reports for
duty;
(B) Changes the date or start or end time of the employee’s work shift, resulting in a  loss of
work shift hours;
(C) Cancels the employee’s work shift; or
(D) Does not ask the employee to perform work when the employee  is scheduled for an on-call
shift.
(3) The requirements for additional compensation in this section do not apply when:
(a) An employer changes the start or end  time of an employee’s work shift by 30 minutes or less;
(b) An employee mutually agrees with another employee to employee-initiated  work shift swaps
or coverage. The employer  may require that work shift swaps or coverage under this paragraph be
preapproved by the employer. The employer may assist employees in finding such  arrangements,
provided that any employer assistance must be limited to helping an employee  identify other em-
ployees who may be available to provide work shift swaps or coverage and  may not include the
employer arranging the work shift swap or coverage;
(c) An employee requests changes to the employee’s written work schedule,  including adding or
subtracting hours, and the employee documents the request in writing;
(d) An employer makes changes to an employee’s written work schedule at the employee’s  re-
quest under ORS 653.436 (6);
(e) An employer subtracts hours from  an employee’s work schedule for disciplinary reasons for
just cause, provided the employer documents the incident  leading to the employee’s discipline in
writing;
(f) An employee’s work shift or on-call shift cannot begin or continue due to threats to  employ-
ees or property or due to the recommendation of a public official;
(g) Operations cannot begin or continue because public utilities fail to supply electricity,  water
or gas or there is a failure in the public utilities or sewer system;
(h) Operations cannot begin or continue due to a natural disaster or a similar  cause not within
the employer’s control, including when the natural disaster or similar cause  physically affects the
work site;
(i) Operations hours change or are substantially altered because a ticketed event is  canceled,
rescheduled or changes in  duration due to circumstances that are outside the employer’s control and
that occur after the employer provides the written work schedule under ORS 653.436;
(j) An employer requests that an employee on  a voluntary standby list work additional hours
as described in ORS 653.432 and the employee consents to work the additional hours; [ or]
Enrolled Senate Bill 1515 (SB 1515-A) Page 2
(k)(A) An  employer requests that an employee work additional hours to address unanticipated
customer needs or unexpected employee absence;
(B) The employee consents in writing to work the additional hours;
(C) If the employer maintains a voluntary  standby list described in ORS 653.432, the employer
has contacted all  of the employees listed on the voluntary standby list and requires additional em-
ployee coverage; and
(D)(i) If the employee is working a work shift at the time the employer  makes the request, the
employer makes the request either individually or as part of a group communication; or
(ii) If the employee is not  working a work shift at the time the employer makes the request, the
employer makes the request through a group communication[ .]; or
(L) An employer is provided with less than  14 days’ notice before the first day of the
work schedule of  the need for leave under ORS chapter 657B or 659A, or of the return from
the use of leave under ORS  chapter 657B or 659A, and the employer makes a change to the
schedule of an employee who was temporarily assigned to specific shifts to cover for an
employee on leave under ORS chapter 657B or 659A.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 657B.010 is amended to read:
657B.010. As used in this chapter:
(1) “Alternate  base year” means the last four completed calendar quarters preceding the benefit
year.
(2) “Average weekly wage” means the amount calculated by the Employment Department as the
state average weekly covered wage under ORS 657.150 (4)(e) as determined not more than  once per
year.
(3) “Base year” means the first four  of the last five completed calendar quarters preceding the
benefit year.
(4) “Benefits” means family and medical leave insurance benefits.
(5)(a) “Benefit year” means, except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a period  of
52 consecutive weeks beginning on the Sunday  immediately preceding the date on which family
leave, medical leave or safe leave commences.
(b) “Benefit year” means, in the event that the 52-week period described in paragraph (a)  of this
subsection would result in an overlap of any quarter of the base year of a previously  filed valid
claim, a period of 53 consecutive weeks beginning  on the Sunday immediately preceding the date
on which family leave, medical leave or safe leave commences.
(6) “Child” means:
(a) A biological  child, adopted child, stepchild or foster child of a covered individual or of the
covered individual’s spouse or domestic partner;
(b) A person  who is or was a legal ward of a covered individual or of the covered individual’s
spouse or domestic partner; or
(c) A person who is  or was in a relationship of in loco parentis with a covered individual or
with the covered individual’s spouse or domestic partner.
(7) “Claimant” means an individual who has submitted an application or  established a claim for
benefits.
(8) “Contribution” or “contributions” means  the money payments made by any of the following
under ORS 657B.150:
(a) An employer;
(b) An employee;
(c) A self-employed individual;
(d) A tribal government; or
(e) An employee of a tribal government.
(9) “Covered individual” means any one of the following who qualifies  under ORS 657B.015 to
receive family and medical leave insurance benefits:
(a) An eligible employee;
(b) A self-employed individual; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 1515 (SB 1515-A) Page 3
(c) An employee of a tribal government.
(10) “Domestic partner” means an individual joined in a domestic partnership.
(11) “Domestic partnership” has the meaning given that term in ORS 106.310.
(12) “Eligible employee” means:
(a)(A) An employee who has earned at least $1,000 in wages during the base year; or
(B) If an employee has not earned at  least $1,000 in wages during the base year, an employee
who has earned at least $1,000 in wages during the alternate base year; and
(b) An employee to whom paid family and medical leave insurance benefits  may be available
under ORS 657B.015.
(13) “Eligible employee’s average weekly wage” means an amount calculated by the  Director of
the Employment Department  by dividing the total wages earned by an eligible employee during the
base year by the number of weeks in the base year.
(14)(a) “Employee” means:
(A) An individual performing services for an employer for remuneration or under any contract
of hire, written or oral, express or implied.
(B) A home care worker as defined in ORS 410.600.
(b) “Employee” does not include:
(A) An independent contractor as defined in ORS 670.600.
(B) A participant in a work training  program administered under a state or federal assistance
program.
(C) A participant in a work-study program that provides students in secondary or  postsecondary
educational institutions with employment opportunities for financial assistance or vocational  train-
ing.
(D) A railroad worker exempted under the federal Railroad Unemployment Insurance Act.
(E) A volunteer.
(F) A judge as defined in ORS 260.005.
(G) A member of the Legislative Assembly.
(H) A holder of public office as defined in ORS 260.005.
(15)(a) “Employer” means any  person that employs one or more employees working anywhere in
this state or any agent or employee of such person to whom the duties of the  person under this
chapter have been delegated.
(b) “Employer” includes:
(A) A political subdivision of this state or any county, city, district, authority or public corpo-
ration, or any instrumentality of a county, city, district, authority or public  corporation, organized
and existing under law or charter;
(B) An individual;
(C) Any type of organization, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, association,
trust, estate, joint stock company or insurance company;
(D) Any successor in interest to an entity described in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph;
(E) A trustee, trustee in bankruptcy or receiver; or
(F) A trustee or legal representative of a deceased person.
(c) “Employer” does not include the federal government or a tribal government.
(16) “Employment agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 658.005.
(17) “Family and medical leave  insurance benefits” means the wage replacement benefits that
are available to a covered individual under ORS 657B.050 or under the terms  of an employer plan
approved under ORS 657B.210, for family leave, medical leave or safe leave.
(18)(a) “Family leave” means leave from work taken by a covered individual:
(A) To care for and bond with a child during the first year after the child’s birth or during  the
first year after the placement of the child through foster care or adoption; or
(B) To care for a family member with a serious health condition.
(b) “Family leave” does not mean:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1515 (SB 1515-A) Page 4
(A) Leave described  in ORS 659A.159 [ (1)(d)] (1)(a) except for leave to care for a child who
requires home care due to an illness, injury or condition that is a serious health condition ;
(B) Leave described in ORS 659A.159 [ (1)(e)] (1)(b); or
(C) Leave authorized under ORS 659A.093.
(19) “Family member” means:
(a) The spouse of a covered individual;
(b) A child [ of a covered individual ] or the child’s spouse or domestic partner;
(c) A parent [ of a covered individual ] or the parent’s spouse or domestic partner;
(d) A sibling or stepsibling of  a covered individual or the sibling’s or stepsibling’s spouse or
domestic partner;
(e) A grandparent of a covered individual or the grandparent’s spouse or domestic partner;
(f) A grandchild of a covered individual or the grandchild’s spouse or domestic partner;
(g) The domestic partner of a covered individual; or
(h) Any individual related by blood or affinity whose close association with a covered  individual
is the equivalent of a family relationship.
(20) “Medical leave” means leave from work taken  by a covered individual that is made neces-
sary by the individual’s own serious health condition.
(21) “Parent” means:
(a) A biological parent, adoptive parent, stepparent or foster parent of a covered individual;
(b) A person who was a foster parent of a covered individual  when the covered individual was
a minor;
(c) A person designated as  the legal guardian of a covered individual at the time the covered
individual was a minor or required a legal guardian;
(d) A person with whom a covered individual was or is in a relationship of in loco parentis; or
(e) A parent of a covered individual’s spouse or domestic partner who meets  a description under
paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection.
(22) “Safe leave” means leave taken for any purpose described in ORS 659A.272.
(23) “Self-employed individual” means:
(a) An individual  who has self-employment income as defined in section 1402(b) of the Internal
Revenue Code as amended and in effect on December 31, 2022; or
(b) An independent contractor as defined in ORS 670.600.
(24) “Serious health condition” [ has the meaning given that term in ORS 659A.150. ] means:
(a) An illness, injury, impairment or physical  or mental condition that requires inpatient
care in a hospital, hospice or residential medical care facility;
(b) An illness, disease or condition that in the medical judgment of the treating  health
care provider poses an imminent danger of death, is  terminal in prognosis with a reasonable
possibility of death in the near future, or requires constant care;
(c) Any period of disability due to pregnancy, or period of absence for prenatal care; or
(d) Any period of absence for the donation of a body  part, organ or tissue, including
preoperative or diagnostic services, surgery, post-operative treatment and recovery.
(25) “Third party administrator” means a third party that enters into an agreement with the
Director of the Employment Department to implement and administer the  paid family and medical
leave program established under this chapter.
(26) “Tribal government” [ has the meaning given that term in ORS 181A.940. ] means:
(a) A tribal government as defined in ORS 181A.940; or
(b) A federally recognized Indian tribe.
(27)(a) “Wages” has the meaning given that term in ORS 657.105.
(b) “Wages” does not mean contribution amounts paid to the  Paid Family and Medical Leave
Insurance Fund by an employer on behalf of an employee under ORS 657B.150 (5).
SECTION 4.
 ORS 657B.010, as amended by section 3 of this 2024 Act, is amended to read:
657B.010. As used in this chapter:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1515 (SB 1515-A) Page 5
(1) “Alternate  base year” means the last four completed calendar quarters preceding the benefit
year.
(2) “Average weekly wage” means the amount calculated by the Employment Department as the
state average weekly covered wage under ORS 657.150 (4)(e) as determined not more than  once per
year.
(3) “Base year” means the first four of the last  five completed calendar quarters preceding the
benefit year.
(4) “Benefits” means family and medical leave insurance benefits.
(5)(a) “Benefit  year” means, except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a period of
52 consecutive weeks beginning on the Sunday immediately  preceding the date on which family
leave, medical leave or safe leave commences.
(b) “Benefit year” means, in the event that the 52-week period described in paragraph (a)  of this
subsection would result  in an overlap of any quarter of the base year of a previously filed valid
claim, a period of 53 consecutive weeks beginning  on the Sunday immediately preceding the date
on which family leave, medical leave or safe leave commences.
(6) “Child” means:
(a) A biological child, adopted child, stepchild or foster child of a covered individual or  of the
covered individual’s spouse or domestic partner;
(b) A person who is or was a legal ward of a covered individual or of the  covered individual’s
spouse or domestic partner; or
(c) A person who is or was in a relationship of in loco parentis with  a covered individual or
with the covered individual’s spouse or domestic partner.
(7) “Claimant” means an individual who has submitted an application or  established a claim for
benefits.
(8) “Contribution” or “contributions” means the money payments made by  any of the following
under ORS 657B.150:
(a) An employer;
(b) An employee;
(c) A self-employed individual;
(d) A tribal government; or
(e) An employee of a tribal government.
(9) “Covered individual” means any  one of the following who qualifies under ORS 657B.015 to
receive family and medical leave insurance benefits:
(a) An eligible employee;
(b) A self-employed individual; or
(c) An employee of a tribal government.
(10) “Domestic partner” means an individual joined in a domestic partnership.
(11) “Domestic partnership” has the meaning given that term in ORS 106.310.
(12) “Eligible employee” means:
(a)(A) An employee who has earned at least $1,000 in wages during the base year; or
(B) If an employee has not earned at  least $1,000 in wages during the base year, an employee
who has earned at least $1,000 in wages during the alternate base year; and
(b) An employee to whom paid family and medical leave insurance benefits  may be available
under ORS 657B.015.
(13) “Eligible employee’s average weekly wage” means an amount calculated by the  Director of
the Employment Department  by dividing the total wages earned by an eligible employee during the
base year by the number of weeks in the base year.
(14)(a) “Employee” means:
(A) An individual performing services for an employer for remuneration or under any contract
of hire, written or oral, express or implied.
(B) A home care worker as defined in ORS 410.600.
(b) “Employee” does not include:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1515 (SB 1515-A) Page 6
(A) An independent contractor as defined in ORS 670.600.
(B) A participant in a work training  program administered under a state or federal assistance
program.
(C) A participant in a work-study program that provides students in secondary or  postsecondary
educational institutions with employment opportunities for financial assistance or vocational  train-
ing.
(D) A railroad worker exempted under the federal Railroad Unemployment Insurance Act.
(E) A volunteer.
(F) A judge as defined in ORS 260.005.
(G) A member of the Legislative Assembly.
(H) A holder of public office as defined in ORS 260.005.
(15)(a) “Employer” means any  person that employs one or more employees working anywhere in
this state or any agent or employee of such person to whom the duties of the  person under this
chapter have been delegated.
(b) “Employer” includes:
(A) A political subdivision of this state or any county, city, district, authority or public corpo-
ration, or any instrumentality of a county, city, district, authority or public  corporation, organized
and existing under law or charter;
(B) An individual;
(C) Any type of organization, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, association,
trust, estate, joint stock company or insurance company;
(D) Any successor in interest to an entity described in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph;
(E) A trustee, trustee in bankruptcy or receiver; or
(F) A trustee or legal representative of a deceased person.
(c) “Employer” does not include the federal government or a tribal government.
(16) “Employment agency” has the meaning given that term in ORS 658.005.
(17) “Family and medical leave  insurance benefits” means the wage replacement benefits that
are available to a covered individual under ORS 657B.050 or under the terms  of an employer plan
approved under ORS 657B.210, for family leave, medical leave or safe leave.
(18)(a) “Family leave” means leave from work taken by a covered individual:
(A) To care for and bond with a child during the first year after the child’s birth or during  the
first year after the placement of the child through foster care or adoption; [ or]
(B) To effectuate the legal process required for placement of a foster  child or the
adoption of a child; or
[(B)] (C) To care for a family member with a serious health condition.
(b) “Family leave” does not mean:
(A) Leave described in ORS 659A.159 (1)(a) except for  leave to care for a child who requires
home care due to an illness, injury or condition that is a serious health condition;
(B) Leave described in ORS 659A.159 (1)(b); or
(C) Leave authorized under ORS 659A.093.
(19) “Family member” means:
(a) The spouse of a covered individual;
(b) A child or the child’s spouse or domestic partner;
(c) A parent or the parent’s spouse or domestic partner;
(d) A sibling or stepsibling of  a covered individual or the sibling’s or stepsibling’s spouse or
domestic partner;
(e) A grandparent of a covered individual or the grandparent’s spouse or domestic partner;
(f) A grandchild of a covered individual or the grandchild’s spouse or domestic partner;
(g) The domestic partner of a covered individual; or
(h) Any individual related by blood or affinity whose close association with a covered  individual
is the equivalent of a family relationship.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1515 (SB 1515-A) Page 7
(20) “Medical leave” means leave from work taken  by a covered individual that is made neces-
sary by the individual’s own serious health condition.
(21) “Parent” means:
(a) A biological parent, adoptive parent, stepparent or foster parent of a covered individual;
(b) A person who was a foster parent of a covered individual  when the covered individual was
a minor;
(c) A person designated as  the legal guardian of a covered individual at the time the covered
individual was a minor or required a legal guardian;
(d) A person with whom a covered individual was or is in a relationship of in loco parentis; or
(e) A parent of a covered individual’s spouse or domestic partner who meets  a description under
paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection.
(22) “Safe leave” means leave taken for any purpose described in ORS 659A.272.
(23) “Self-employed individual” means:
(a) An individual  who has self-employment income as defined in section 1402(b) of the Internal
Revenue Code as amended and in effect on December 31, 2022; or
(b) An independent contractor as defined in ORS 670.600.
(24) “Serious health condition” means:
(a) An illness, injury, impairment or physical or mental condition that requires inpatient  care
in a hospital, hospice or residential medical care facility;
(b) An illness, disease or condition that in the medical judgment  of the treating health care
provider poses an imminent danger of death, is terminal in prognosis with  a reasonable possibility
of death in the near future, or requires constant care;
(c) Any period of disability due to pregnancy, or period of absence for prenatal care; or
(d) Any period of absence for the donation of a body part, organ or tissue,  including preopera-
tive or diagnostic services, surgery, post-operative treatment and recovery.
(25) “Third party administrator” means a third party that enters into an agreement with the
Director of the Employment Department to implement and administer the  paid family and medical
leave program established under this chapter.
(26) “Tribal government” means:
(a) A tribal government as defined in ORS 181A.940; or
(b) A federally recognized Indian tribe.
(27)(a) “Wages” has the meaning given that term in ORS 657.105.
(b) “Wages” does not mean contribution amounts paid to the  Paid Family and Medical Leave
Insurance Fund by an employer on behalf of an employee under ORS 657B.150 (5).
SECTION 5.
 ORS 657B.030 is amended to read:
657B.030. (1) Family and medical leave insurance  benefits are in addition to any paid sick time
under ORS 653.606, vacation leave or other paid leave earned by an employee.
(2)(a) [ An employer may permit  an employee to use all or a portion of paid sick time, vacation
leave or any other paid leave earned by the employee  in addition to ] Except as otherwise provided
in paragraph (b) of this subsection, an employee is entitled  to use any accrued paid sick
leave, accrued paid vacation leave or any other paid leave that is offered by the employer  in
addition to  receiving paid family and medical leave insurance benefits during a period of leave
taken for family leave, medical leave or safe leave to the extent that the total combined  amount
of accrued paid leave and benefits received by the employee  does not exceed an amount equal
to the employee’s full wage replacement during the period of family leave,  medical leave or
safe leave.
(b) An employer may permit an employee to use accrued  paid leave in addition to re-
ceiving paid family and  medical leave insurance benefits such that the total combined
amounts received by the employee may exceed the employee’s full wage replacement amount
as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(3) Subject to the terms of any agreement between the  employee and the employer or the
terms of a  collective bargaining agreement, the employer may determine the particular order
Enrolled Senate Bill 1515 (SB 1515-A) Page 8
in which accrued leave is to be used when more than one type of accrued leave is  available
to the covered individual.
[(3)] (4) In  any week in which an employee is eligible to receive workers’ compensation time
loss benefits under ORS chapter 656  or unemployment  benefits under ORS chapter [ 656 or ] 657,
the employee is disqualified from receiving family and medical leave insurance benefits.
SECTION 6.  ORS 657B.050 is amended to read:
657B.050. (1) The  Director of the Employment Department shall set the weekly benefit amount
of family and medical leave insurance benefits that a covered individual qualifies for as follows:
(a) If the eligible employee’s  average weekly wage is equal to or less than 65 percent of the
average weekly wage, the  employee’s weekly benefit amount shall be 100 percent of the employee’s
average weekly wage.
(b) If the eligible employee’s average weekly wage is greater than 65 percent of the average
weekly wage, the employee’s weekly benefit amount is the sum of:
(A) 65 percent of the average weekly wage; and
(B) 50 percent of the employee’s average weekly wage that is  greater than 65 percent of the
average weekly wage.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the director shall establish:
(a) A maximum weekly benefit amount of 120 percent of the average weekly wage.
(b) A minimum weekly benefit amount of five percent of the average weekly wage.
(3) The director shall determine, based on the contribution amounts made by  a self-employed
individual, a tribal government or  the employees of a tribal government under ORS 657B.150, the
amount of benefits payable to a self-employed individual or to an employee of a tribal government.
(4) Benefits are payable only to the extent that moneys are  available in the Paid Family and
Medical Leave Insurance Fund for that purpose. The state, any political subdivision  of the state and
any state agency are not liable for any amount in excess of this limit.
(5) Benefits payable under this section are exempt from garnishment except for:
(a) Child or spousal support garnishments; and
(b) Restitution for crime victims.
ALIGNMENT
(Statutory Changes)
SECTION 7.
 ORS 657B.020 is amended to read:
657B.020. (1) A covered individual may qualify  for up to 12 weeks of family and medical leave
insurance benefits per benefit year for leave taken for any of the following purposes, in  any combi-
nation:
(a) Family leave;
(b) Medical leave; or
(c) Safe leave.
[(2) Notwithstanding ORS 657B.025 and except  as provided under subsection (3) of this section, a
covered individual who has taken any amount of paid leave available under subsection  (1) of this sec-
tion may take a total of 16 weeks of leave in the benefit year in any combination  of the paid leave
available under subsection (1) of this section,  not to exceed 12 weeks, and unpaid leave under ORS
659A.159 for which the covered individual is eligible under ORS 659A.156. The leave may be  taken for
any purpose for which leave is allowable under the respective leave programs. ]
[(3)] (2) In addition to the leave available under [ subsections (1) and  (2)] subsection (1) of this
section,  a  covered individual may qualify for up to two additional weeks of benefits for limitations
related to  pregnancy, childbirth or a related medical condition, including but not limited to
lactation, for a total amount of leave under this subsection and [ subsections (1) and (2) ] subsection
(1) of this section, not to exceed [ 18] 14 weeks per benefit year.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 659A.159 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1515 (SB 1515-A) Page 9
659A.159. (1) Family leave under ORS 659A.150 to 659A.186 may be taken by  an eligible em-
ployee for any of the following purposes:
[(a) To care for an infant or newly adopted child under  18 years of age, or for a newly placed
foster child under 18 years of  age, or for an adopted or foster child older than 18 years of age if the
child is incapable of self-care because of a mental or physical disability. ]
[(b) To care for a family member with a serious health condition. ]
[(c) To recover from or seek treatment for a serious health condition of  the employee that renders
the employee unable to perform at least one of the essential functions of the employee’s regular
position.]
[(d)] (a) To  care for a child of the employee who is suffering from an illness, injury or condition
that [ is not a  serious health condition but that ] requires home care or who requires home care due
to the closure of the child’s school or child care provider as a result of a public health emergency.
[(e)] (b) To deal with the death of a family member by:
(A) Attending the funeral or alternative to a funeral of the family member;
(B) Making arrangements necessitated by the death of the family member; or
(C) Grieving the death of the family member.
[(2)(a) Leave under subsection (1)(a) of this section must  be completed within 12 months after birth
or placement of the child, and an eligible employee is  not entitled to any period of family leave under
subsection (1)(a) of this  section after the expiration of 12 months after birth or placement of the
child.]
[(b)] (2) Leave under  subsection [ (1)(e)] (1)(b) of this section must be completed within 60 days
of the date on which the eligible employee receives notice of the death of a family member.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 659A.162 is amended to read:
659A.162. (1)(a) Except as  specifically provided by ORS [ 657B.020 and] 659A.150 to 659A.186, an
eligible  employee  is entitled to up to a total of 12 weeks of family leave for a purpose described
in ORS 659A.159 within any one-year period.
(b) Leave taken under ORS  659A.150 to 659A.186 is in addition to, and may not be taken
concurrently with, any leave taken pursuant to ORS chapter 657B.
(2)(a) Except as provided by paragraph (b) of this subsection, an eligible  employee is entitled to
a total of two weeks of family leave for the purposes described in ORS 659A.159 [ (1)(e)] (1)(b).
(b) An eligible employee is entitled to the period of  leave described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection upon the death  of each family member of the employee within any one-year period, except
that leave taken as provided by this subsection  may not exceed [ the total period of family leave au-
thorized by subsection (1) of this section ] a total of four weeks within any one-year period .
(c) A covered employer may not require an eligible employee to take multiple periods of leave
described in ORS 659A.159 [ (1)(e)] (1)(b) concurrently if more  than one family member of the em-
ployee dies during the one-year period.
(d) All leave taken for the purposes described in ORS 659A.159 [ (1)(e)] (1)(b) shall be counted
toward the total period of family leave authorized by subsection (1) of this section.
(3)[(a)] In addition to the 12 weeks of family leave authorized by subsection (1) of this section,
an eligible employee may take a total of 12 weeks of leave within any one-year period  for an illness,
injury or condition related  to the eligible employee’s own pregnancy or childbirth that disables the
eligible employee from performing any available job duties offered by the covered employer.
[(b) An eligible employee who takes 12 weeks of family leave within a  one-year period for the
purpose specified in ORS 659A.159 (1)(a) may take up to an additional 12  weeks of leave within the
one-year period for the purpose specified in ORS 659A.159 (1)(d). ]
(4) When two or more family members work for the same covered employer,  the eligible em-
ployees may not take concurrent family leave unless:
[(a) One employee needs to care for another employee who is a  family member and who is suffering
from a serious health condition; ]
Enrolled Senate Bill 1515 (SB 1515-A) Page 10
[(b)] (a) One employee needs to care for a child [ who has a serious health condition ] for a pur-
pose described in ORS 659A.159 (1)(a)  while another employee [ who is a family member is also
suffering from a serious health condition ] is taking leave under subsection (3) of this section ; or
[(c)] (b) [ The employees are ] One or more of the employees is  taking leave described  in ORS
659A.159 [(1)(e)] (1)(b).
[(5) An eligible employee may take family leave for the  purpose specified in ORS 659A.159 (1)(a)
in two or more nonconsecutive periods of leave only with the approval of the employer. ]
[(6) Leave need not be provided to an eligible employee by a  covered employer for the purpose
specified in ORS 659A.159 (1)(d) if another family member is available to care for the child. ]
[(7)] (5) A covered employer may not reduce the amount of family leave available  to an eligible
employee under this  section by any period the employee is unable to work because of a disabling
compensable injury.
[(8)(a)] (6) The Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor  and Industries shall adopt rules governing
when family leave [ for a serious health condition of an eligible employee or a family member  of the
eligible employee ] may be taken  intermittently or by working a reduced workweek. Rules adopted
by the commissioner under this paragraph  shall allow taking of family leave on an intermittent basis
or by use of a reduced workweek  to the extent permitted by federal law and to the extent that
taking family leave  on an intermittent basis or by use of a reduced workweek does not result in the
loss of an eligible employee’s exempt status under the federal Fair Labor Standards Act.
[(b) The commissioner shall adopt rules governing when family leave  for the purposes described
in ORS 659A.159 (1)(e) may be taken to the  extent permitted by federal law and to the extent that
taking family leave on an  intermittent basis does not result in the loss of an eligible employee’s exempt
status under the federal Fair Labor Standards Act. ]
SECTION 10.  ORS 659A.165 is amended to read:
659A.165. (1)  Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a covered employer may re-
quire an eligible employee to give the employer written notice  at least 30 days before commencing
family leave. The employer may require the employee to include an explanation of the need  for the
leave in the notice.
(2) An eligible employee may commence taking family leave  without prior notice under the fol-
lowing circumstances:
[(a) An unexpected serious health condition of an employee or family member of an employee; ]
[(b)] (a) An unexpected illness, injury or condition of a child  of the employee that requires home
care;
[(c) A premature birth, unexpected adoption or unexpected foster placement; or ]
[(d)] (b) The death of a family member[ .]; or
(c) The leave is for the purpose described under ORS 659A.162 (3).
(3) If an employee commences leave without prior  notice under subsection (2) of this section, the
employee must give oral notice to the employer within 24 hours of the commencement of the  leave,
and must provide the  written notice required by subsection (1) of this section within three days after
the employee returns to work. The oral notice required by  this subsection may be given by any
other person on behalf of the employee taking the leave.
(4) Except as provided  in this subsection, if the employee fails to give notice as required by
subsections (1) and (3) of this section, the employer may reduce the total period of family  leave au-
thorized by ORS 659A.162  by three weeks, and the employee may be subject to disciplinary action
under a uniformly applied policy  or practice of the employer. A reduction of family leave under this
subsection may not limit leave described in ORS 659A.159 [ (1)(e)] (1)(b).
SECTION 11.
 ORS 659A.168 is amended to read:
659A.168. (1)  Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a covered employer may re-
quire medical verification from a health  care provider of the need for the leave if the leave is for
a purpose described in ORS 659A.159 [ (1)(b) to (d) ] (1)(a) other than to care for  a child who requires
home care due to the  closure of the child’s school or child care provider as a result of a public
health emergency , or if the  leave is for the purpose described in ORS 659A.162 (3) . If an em-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1515 (SB 1515-A) Page 11
ployee is required to give notice under ORS 659A.165 (1),  the employer may require that medical
verification be provided  by the employee before the leave period commences. If the employee com-
mences family  leave without prior notice pursuant to ORS 659A.165 (2), the medical verification
must be provided by the employee within 15 days after the employer  requests the medical verifica-
tion. [ The employer may require an employee to obtain the opinion of a second health care  provider
designated by the employer, at the employer’s expense. If the opinion of the  second health care provider
conflicts with the medical  verification provided by the employee, the employer may require the two
health care providers to designate a third health care provider  to provide an opinion at the employer’s
expense. The opinion of the third health care provider shall be final and binding on the employer  and
employee. In addition to the medical verifications provided for in this subsection, an employer may  re-
quire subsequent medical verification on a reasonable basis. ]
(2) A covered employer may require medical verification for leave  taken for the purpose de-
scribed in ORS 659A.159 [ (1)(d)] (1)(a) , other than to care for a child who requires home  care due
to the closure  of the child’s school or child care provider as a result of a public health emergency,
only after an employee has taken more than  three days of leave under ORS 659A.159 [ (1)(d)] (1)(a)
during any one-year period. Any medical  verification required under this subsection must be paid for
by the covered employer. An employer may not require an employee to obtain the opinion of a sec-
ond health care provider for the purpose of medical verification required under this subsection.
(3) A covered employer may request verification for the need for  leave for the purpose in ORS
659A.159 [(1)(d)] (1)(a) to care for a child who requires home care due  to the closure of the child’s
school or child care  provider as a result of a public health emergency. A request for verification
may include a request for:
(a) The name of the child requiring home care;
(b) The name of the school or child care provider that is subject to closure;
(c) A statement from the employee that no other family member of the child is willing  and able
to care for the child; and
(d) A statement that special circumstances exist that require  the employee to provide home care
for the child during the day, if the child is older than 14 years of age.
[(4) Subject to the approval of the health care provider, the  employee taking family leave for a se-
rious health condition of the employee or a family  member of the employee shall make a reasonable
effort to schedule  medical treatment or supervision at times that will minimize disruption of the
employer’s operations.]
(Temporary Provisions)
SECTION 12.
Section 13 of this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 659A.150 to
659A.186.
SECTION 13. (1) In addition to the  12 weeks of family leave authorized by ORS 659A.162
(1), an eligible employee is entitled  to a total of two weeks of leave to effectuate the legal
process required for placement of a foster child or the adoption of a child.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 659A.165 (1), an eligible employee shall provide oral notice to the
covered employer within 24 hours of the commencement of  leave under this section, and
must provide written notice to the  employer within three days after the employee returns
to work.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 14.  ORS 657B.025 is amended to read:
657B.025. Any family leave or medical leave taken under this chapter must be taken  concur-
rently with any leave taken by  an eligible employee [ under ORS 659A.150 to 659A.186 or ] under the
federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (P.L. 103-3) for the same purposes.
SECTION 15.  ORS 659A.150 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1515 (SB 1515-A) Page 12
659A.150. As used in ORS 659A.150 to 659A.186:
(1) “Covered employer” means an employer described in ORS 659A.153.
(2) “Eligible employee” means any  employee of a covered employer other than those employees
exempted under the provisions of ORS 659A.156.
(3) “Family leave” means a leave of absence described in ORS [ 659A.159] 659A.150 to
659A.186, except that “family leave” does not include leave taken by an eligible employee who is
unable to work because of a disabling compensable injury, as defined in  ORS 656.005, under ORS
chapter 656.
(4) “Family member” means:
(a) The spouse of [ a covered individual ] an eligible employee;
(b) A child of [ a covered individual ] an eligible employee  or the child’s spouse or domestic
partner;
(c) A parent of [ a covered individual ] an eligible employee or the parent’s spouse or domestic
partner;
(d) A sibling  or stepsibling of [ a covered individual ] an eligible employee  or the sibling’s or
stepsibling’s spouse or domestic partner;
(e) A grandparent of [ a covered individual ] an eligible employee  or the grandparent’s spouse
or domestic partner;
(f) A grandchild of [ a covered individual ] an eligible employee  or the grandchild’s spouse  or
domestic partner;
(g) The domestic partner of [ a covered individual ] an eligible employee; or
(h) Any individual related by blood or affinity whose close  association with [ a covered
individual] an eligible employee is the equivalent of a family relationship.
(5) “Health care provider” means:
(a) A person who is primarily  responsible for providing health care to an eligible employee or
a family member of an eligible employee, who is performing within the scope  of the person’s pro-
fessional license or certificate and who is:
(A) A physician licensed under ORS chapter 677;
(B) A physician assistant licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525;
(C) A dentist licensed under ORS 679.090;
(D) A psychologist licensed under ORS 675.030;
(E) An optometrist licensed under ORS 683.070;
(F) A naturopath licensed under ORS 685.080;
(G) A registered nurse licensed under ORS 678.050;
(H) A nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375;
(I) A direct entry midwife licensed under ORS 687.420;
(J) A licensed registered nurse licensed by the Oregon State  Board of Nursing as a nurse
practitioner specializing in nurse midwifery;
(K) A  regulated social worker authorized to practice regulated social work under ORS 675.510
to 675.600; or
(L) A chiropractic physician licensed under ORS 684.054, but only to the extent  the chiropractic
physician  provides  treatment consisting of manual manipulation of the spine to correct a subluxation
demonstrated to exist by X-rays.
(b) A person who is primarily responsible  for the treatment of an eligible employee or a family
member of an eligible employee solely through spiritual means,  including but not limited to a
Christian Science practitioner.
(6) “Public health emergency” means:
(a) A public health emergency declared under ORS 433.441.
(b) An emergency declared under ORS 401.165 if related to  a public health emergency as defined
in ORS 433.442.
[(7) “Serious health condition” means: ]
Enrolled Senate Bill 1515 (SB 1515-A) Page 13
[(a) An illness, injury, impairment or physical or mental condition that requires inpatient care in
a hospital, hospice or residential medical care facility; ]
[(b) An illness, disease or  condition that in the medical judgment of the treating health care pro-
vider poses an imminent  danger of death, is terminal in prognosis with a reasonable possibility of
death in the near future, or requires constant care; ]
[(c) Any period of disability due to pregnancy, or period of absence for prenatal care; or ]
[(d) Any period of absence for the donation of a body  part, organ or tissue, including preoperative
or diagnostic services, surgery, post-operative treatment and recovery. ]
SECTION 16.  ORS 659A.156 is amended to read:
659A.156. (1) All employees  of a covered employer are eligible to take leave for [ one] any of the
purposes specified in ORS [ 659A.159 (1)(b) to (e) ] 659A.150 to 659A.186 except:
(a) An employee who was employed by the covered employer  for fewer than 180 days imme-
diately before the date on which the family leave would commence.
(b) An  employee who worked an average of fewer than 25 hours per week for the covered em-
ployer during the  180 days immediately preceding the date on which the family leave would com-
mence.
[(2) All employees of a covered employer are eligible to take leave for the purpose specified  in ORS
659A.159 (1)(a) except an employee who was employed by the covered employer for  fewer than 180 days
immediately before the date on which the family leave would commence. ]
[(3)] (2) Notwithstanding [ subsections (1) and (2) ] subsection (1)  of this section, all employees
of a covered employer are eligible to take leave for [ one] any of the purposes  specified in ORS
[659A.159 (1)(a) to (e) ] 659A.150 to 659A.186  during a period of time covered by a public health
emergency except:
(a) An employee who worked for the covered employer for fewer than 30 days immediately be-
fore the date on which the family leave would commence; or
(b) An employee who worked for the  covered employer for an average of fewer than 25 hours
per week in the 30 days immediately before the date on which the family leave would commence.
[(4)(a)] (3)(a) Notwithstanding [ subsections (1) and (2) ] subsection (1)  of  this section, an em-
ployee of a covered employer is eligible to take leave for [ one] any of the purposes specified in ORS
[659A.159 (1)(a) to (e) ] 659A.150 to 659A.186  if the employee:
(A)(i) Separates from employment with the covered employer, irrespective of any reason;
(ii) Is eligible to take  leave under subsection (1) [ or (2) ] of this section at the time the employee
separates; and
(iii) Is reemployed by the covered employer within 180 days of separation from employment; or
(B)(i) Is eligible to take leave under  subsection (1) [ or (2) ] of this section at the beginning of a
temporary cessation of scheduled hours of 180 days or less; and
(ii) Returns to work at the end of the temporary cessation of scheduled hours of 180 days or less.
(b) Any family leave taken  by the employee within any one-year period continues to count
against the length of time of family leave the employee is entitled under ORS 659A.162.
(c) The amount of time that an employee  is deemed to have worked for a covered employer prior
to a break in service due to a separation  from employment or a temporary cessation of scheduled
hours shall be restored to the employee when the  employee is reemployed by the employer within
180 days  of separation from employment or when the employee returns to work at the end of the
temporary cessation of scheduled hours of 180 days or less.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 659A.171 is amended to read:
659A.171. (1) After returning to work after taking family leave under the provisions of ORS
659A.150 to 659A.186, an eligible employee is  entitled to be restored to the position of employment
held by the employee when the leave commenced if that  position still exists, without regard to
whether the employer filled the position with a replacement worker during the  period of family
leave. If the position held by the employee at the time family leave commenced no longer exists, the
employee is entitled to be restored to  any available equivalent position with equivalent employment
benefits, pay and other terms and  conditions of employment. If an equivalent position is not avail-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1515 (SB 1515-A) Page 14
able at  the job site of the employee’s former position, the employer shall offer the employee an
equivalent  position  at a job site located within 50 miles of the job site of the employee’s former
position, if such a position is available. If equivalent  positions are available at multiple job sites, the
employer shall first offer the  employee the position at the job site that is nearest to the job site of
the employee’s former position.
(2) Except for employee benefits used during the period of leave,  the taking of family leave un-
der ORS 659A.150 to 659A.186 shall not result  in the loss of any employment benefit accrued before
the date on which the leave commenced.
(3) This section does not entitle any employee to:
(a) Any accrual of seniority or employment benefits during a period of family leave; or
(b) Any right, benefit or position of employment other than the rights, benefits and position  that
the employee would have been entitled to had the employee not taken the family leave.
(4)(a) Before restoring  an employee to a position under subsection (1) of this section, an em-
ployer may require  that the employee receive certification from the employee’s health care provider
that the employee is able to resume work. Certification under this subsection may only be  required
pursuant to a uniformly applied practice or policy of the employer.
(b) This subsection does not affect the ability of an employer to require  an employee during a
period of family  leave to report periodically to the employer on the employee’s status and on the
employee’s intention to return to work.
(5)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b)  of this subsection, benefits are not required to con-
tinue to  accrue during a period of family leave unless continuation or accrual is required under an
agreement of the employer and the employee, a collective bargaining agreement or an  employer
policy.
(b) If the employee is provided group health insurance, the  employee is entitled to the contin-
uation of group health insurance coverage during the period of family leave on the  same terms as
if the employee had continued to work. If family member coverage is provided to the employee,
family member coverage must be maintained during the period of family leave. The employee must
continue to make any regular contributions to the cost of the health insurance premiums.
(c) Notwithstanding ORS 652.610 (3) and except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,
if the employer is required or elects to pay any part of the costs  of providing disability, life or other
insurance  coverage  for an employee during the period of family leave that should have been paid
by the employee, the employer may deduct  from the employee’s pay such amounts upon the
employee’s return to work until the amount the employer advanced  toward the payments is paid. In
no event  may the total amount deducted for insurance under the provisions of this subsection exceed
10 percent of the employee’s gross pay each pay period.
(6) Notwithstanding ORS 652.610 (3), if the employer pays any  part of the costs of health, disa-
bility, life or other insurance coverage for an employee under the provisions  of subsection (5) of this
section, and the employee does not return to employment with the employer after taking  family
leave, the employer  may deduct amounts paid by the employer from any amounts owed by the em-
ployer to the employee, or may seek to recover those  amounts by any other legal means, unless the
employee fails to return to work because of[ :]
[(a) A continuation,  reoccurrence or onset of a serious health condition that would entitle the em-
ployee to leave for one of the purposes specified by ORS 659A.159 (1)(b) or (c); or ]
[(b) Other ] circumstances beyond the control of the employee.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 659A.177 is amended to read:
659A.177. [(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of  ORS 659A.150 to 659A.186, if a teacher re-
quests leave for one of the purposes specified in ORS 659A.159 (1)(b) or (c), the need for the leave  is
foreseeable, and the employee will be on  leave for more than 20 percent of the total number of working
days in the period during which the  leave would extend, the employer of the teacher may require that
the employee elect one of the two following options: ]
[(a) The employee may elect to take leave for a period or periods of a particular  duration, not to
exceed the duration of the anticipated medical treatment; or ]
Enrolled Senate Bill 1515 (SB 1515-A) Page 15
[(b) The employee may elect to transfer  temporarily to an available alternative position that better
accommodates recurring periods of leave than the regular position  of the employee. The teacher must
be qualified for the alternative position,  and the position must have pay and benefits that are equivalent
to the pay and benefits of the employee’s regular position. ]
[(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS 659A.150  to 659A.186, if a teacher commences a
period of  family leave for the purpose specified in ORS 659A.159 (1)(c) more than five weeks before the
end of an academic term, the  employer of the teacher may require that the employee continue on family
leave until the end of the term if: ]
[(a) The leave is of at least three weeks’ duration; and ]
[(b) The employee’s return to employment would occur during the three-week  period before the end
of the term. ]
[(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS 659A.150  to 659A.186, if a teacher commences a
period of family leave for one of the purposes specified in ORS 659A.159 (1)(a) or (b) during the five
weeks before the end of an academic term, the employer of the teacher may require that the  employee
continue on family leave until the end of the term if: ]
[(a) The leave is of at least two weeks’ duration; and ]
[(b) The employee’s  return to employment would occur during the two-week period before the end
of the term. ]
[(4)] (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS 659A.150 to 659A.186, if a teacher com-
mences a period of family leave for [ one of the purposes ] the purpose  specified  in ORS 659A.159
[(1)(a), (b) or (e) ] (1)(b) during  the three-week period before the end of the term, and the duration
of the leave is greater than five working  days, the employer of the teacher may require that the
employee continue on family leave until the end of the term.
[(5)] (2) The provisions of this section apply only to an employee who is employed principally
in an instructional capacity  by a public kindergarten, elementary school, secondary school or edu-
cation service district.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 659A.186 is amended to read:
659A.186. (1) ORS 659A.150 to 659A.186 do not limit any right of  an employee to any leave that
is similar to the leave described in ORS 659A.159 (1) and to  which the employee may be entitled
under any agreement between the employer and the employee, collective bargaining agreement  or
employer  policy.
(2) ORS 659A.150 to 659A.186 shall be construed to the extent possible in a manner that  is
consistent with any similar  provisions of the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993. If family
leave taken under ORS 659A.150 to 659A.186 qualifies as protected leave pursuant  to the federal
Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (P.L. 103-3) [ or qualifies as  family leave or medical leave taken
pursuant to ORS chapter 657B ], family leave  taken under ORS 659A.150 to 659A.186 must be taken
concurrently with, and not in addition to, any leave taken  under the federal Family and Medical
Leave Act of 1993 (P.L. 103-3) [ and under ORS chapter 657B ].
MISCELLANEOUS
SECTION 20. The unit captions  used in this 2024 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
REPEALS
SECTION 21. (1) Section 1 of this 2024 Act is repealed on December 31, 2025.
(2) Section 13 of this 2024 Act is repealed on January 1, 2025.
OPERATIVE DATES
Enrolled Senate Bill 1515 (SB 1515-A) Page 16
SECTION 22. (1) Sections 12 and 13 of  this 2024 Act and the amendments to ORS 653.455,
657B.010, 657B.020, 657B.025, 657B.030, 657B.050, 659A.150, 659A.156, 659A.159,  659A.162,
659A.165, 659A.168, 659A.171, 659A.177 and 659A.186 by sections 2, 3, 5 to 11 and 14 to 19 of this
2024 Act become operative on July 1, 2024.
(2) The amendments to ORS  657B.010 by section 4 of this 2024 Act become operative on
January 1, 2025.
(3) Notwithstanding the operative date specified in subsection  (1) of this section, the
Bureau of Labor and Industries and the Employment Department may take any action before
the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section  that is necessary for the bureau
and the department to exercise,  on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1)
of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the bureau  and the de-
partment by sections 12 and 13 and the amendments to ORS  653.455, 657B.010, 657B.020,
657B.025, 657B.030, 657B.050, 659A.150,  659A.156, 659A.159, 659A.162, 659A.165, 659A.168,
659A.171, 659A.177 and 659A.186 by sections 2, 3, 5 to 11 and 14 to 19 of this 2024 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 23. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate February 14, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House February 27, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1515 (SB 1515-A) Page 17